Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3062.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 23-14.1-1, 23-14.1-3, 23-14.1-5, 23-14.1-7 and 23-14.1-11 of the
General Laws in Chapter 23-14.1 entitled "Health Professional Loan Repayment Program" are
hereby amended to read as follows:
23-14.1-1. Legislative findings.
The general assembly finds that:
(1) It is the right of every citizen of the state to have ready access to quality health care;
and
(2) Health care facilities serving the poor, including community health centers throughout
the state, are experiencing increasing difficulty in attracting and retaining physicians and other
health professionals to administer to the needy underserved populations they serve. Therefore, it is
the general assembly’s intent to provide incentives, in the form of loan repayment, to physicians,
dentists, dental hygienists, nurse practitioners, certified nurse midwives, physician assistants and
any other eligible health care professional under § 338A of the Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C.
§ 254l, who desire to serve the health care needs of medically underserved individuals in Rhode
Island; and
(3) There currently exists a national and regional shortage of primary care healthcare
providers. Primary care healthcare is provided by physicians, nurse practitioners, and physician
assistants and the overall number of medical professionals entering the field of primary care

healthcare is declining. It is increasingly difficult for primary care practices to hire nurses, medical
assistants, behavioral health clinicians and other key staff, which is leading to even higher burnout
among primary care providers. Therefore, it is the intent of the general assembly to provide
incentives, in the form of loan repayment, to physicians, nurse practitioners and physician assistants
who desire to provide primary care health services in Rhode Island.
23-14.1-3. Health professional loan repayment program established.
(a) There is established within the department, to be administered by the director, the health
professional loan repayment program whose purpose shall be to support:
(1) The the recruitment and retention of high-quality health professionals working with
underserved populations in identified health professional shortage areas (HPSAs) by providing loan
repayment to eligible health professionals to defray the cost of their professional education; or
(2) The recruitment and retention of high-quality physicians, nurse practitioners and
physician assistants committed to working in primary care health settings in the state for at least
two (2) years providing loan repayment to eligible health professionals to defray the cost of their
professional education.
23-14.1-5. Duties of the board.
The board shall:
(1) Determine which areas of the state shall be eligible to participate in the loan repayment
program each year, based on health professional shortage area designations;
(2) Determine which areas of the state shall be eligible to participate in the loan repayment
program each year, based on primary care provider shortages;
(2)(3) Receive and consider all applications for loan repayment made by eligible health
professionals;
(3)(4) Conduct a careful and full investigation of the ability, character, financial needs, and
qualifications of each applicant;
(4)(5) Consider the intent of the applicant to practice in a health professional shortage area
or commitment to providing primary care healthcare services, and to adhere to all the requirements
for participation in the loan repayment program;
(5)(6) Submit to the director a list of those individuals eligible for loan repayment from
each program and amount of loan repayment to be granted;
(6)(7) Promulgate rules and regulations to ensure an effective implementation and
administration of the program programs;
(7)(8) Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the board shall approve and
submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president
LC005336/SUB A - Page 2 of 6

of the senate, and the secretary of state, of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall
provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, including meeting
minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, applications considered and their disposition, rules
or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, polices and plans developed, approved, or modified,
and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and
expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a
summary of any clerical, administrative, or technical support received; a summary of performance
during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings, and remedies; a synopsis
of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the committee; a summary of
any training courses held pursuant to this chapter; a briefing on anticipated activities in the
upcoming fiscal year, and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be
posted electronically on the websites of the general assembly and the secretary of state pursuant to
the provisions of § 42-20-8.2. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible
for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection; and
(8)(9) Conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members within six (6)
months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the
board, be approved by the board, and be conducted by the chair of the board. The board may
approve the use of any board and/or staff members and/or individuals to assist with training. The
training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapter 46 of title
42, chapter 14 of title 36, chapter 2 of title 38; and the board’s rules and regulations. The director
of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of June 16, 2006, prepare and
disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title
36, and chapter 2 of title 38.
23-14.1-7. Conditions of loan repayment.
(a) Loan repayments under the provisions of this chapter shall be based upon the condition
that the recipient apply for a license to practice medicine, dentistry, dental hygiene, nurse
midwifery, as a registered nurse practitioner, or as a health care professional under § 338A of the
Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. § 254l, or be registered as a physician assistant in Rhode
Island at the earliest practicable opportunity.
(b) A recipient must agree to accept all patients regardless of their ability to pay for services
received. A recipient must agree to accept all forms of insurance as payment in full, including Titles
XVIII and XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.
(c) A recipient shall be required to practice full-time in a health professional shortage area
for a minimum of two (2) years in order to be eligible to participate in the program.
LC005336/SUB A - Page 3 of 6

(d) Recipients of state-funded primary care loan repayment awards shall be subject to the
same service hour requirements applicable under the federal State Loan Repayment Program,
including the definition of full-time service or which a minimum percentage shall be dedicated to
direct patient care consistent with federal program requirements.
23-14.1-11. Appropriation.
(a) The general assembly shall annually appropriate one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) deposited into a restricted receipt account to
implement the loan repayment program established in § 23-14.1-3 for the purpose of repayment of
health education loans as outlined in this bill chapter. Those One hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) in funds shall be taken from the department of health appropriation for the governor’s
children’s health initiative, (RIte Track program). Funds in this account shall be used only for the
purpose of repayment of health education loans as outlined in this chapter. The state controller is
authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that
sum, or so much of it as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt to him or her of duly
authenticated vouchers. Implementation of this program is contingent upon the appropriation of the
required resources.
(b) Of the funds appropriated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be designated for state-funded primary care loan repayment
awards to eligible primary care health professionals, including physicians, physician assistants, and
nurse practitioners.
(c) Awards funded pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be administered through
the existing health professional loan repayment program infrastructure, including execution of
contracts, enforcement of obligations, and repayment penalties.
(d) Awards funded pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall not be subject to federal
Health Professional Shortage Area (HPSA) requirements or federal site eligibility criteria under the
State Loan Repayment Program.
(e) The department shall administer, track, and report awards issued pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section as a distinct funding category separate and apart from federally funded loan
repayment awards.
(f) Awards funded pursuant to subsection (b) of this section may be supported with state
funds or other non-federal funds, and may also be used in combination with federal funds awarded
under the federal State Loan Repayment Program established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 254q-1,
provided that any award funded in whole or in part with federal funds shall remain subject to all
applicable federal requirements.
LC005336/SUB A - Page 4 of 6

(g) Awards funded solely with state or other non-federal funds shall not be subject to
federal Health Professional Shortage Area (HPSA) requirements or federal site eligibility criteria.
(h) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, and each fiscal year thereafter, the general
assembly shall annually appropriate a sum as it may deem necessary, but not less than five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000), to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and the state controller is
hereby authorized and directed to draw the controller’s orders upon the general treasurer for the
payment of the sum(s) or so much thereof as may be required from time to time to be deposited in
a restricted receipt account upon receipt by the general treasurer of properly authenticated vouchers
submitted by the director.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005336/SUB A
========
LC005336/SUB A - Page 5 of 6